California statutes. Public Contract Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1131, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

20224.5.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20225.

The general manager may establish districtwide purchasing standards, the purpose of which is to insure the necessary quality of supplies and equipment purchased by, or under the supervision of, the district and to permit the consolidation of purchases in order to effect greater economy in district purchasing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1131, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

20226.

Notwithstanding Section 20221, and upon a finding by two-thirds of all members of the board that the proposed purchase in compliance with Sections 20221 and 20222 does not constitute a method of procurement adequate for the operation of district facilities or equipment, the board may direct the procurement of prototype equipment or modifications in an amount sufficient to conduct and evaluate operational testing without further observance of any provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1131, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

20227.

Notwithstanding Section 20221, the board may direct the purchase of any supply, equipment, or material without observance of any provision requiring contracts, bids, or notice upon a finding by two-thirds of all members of the board that there is only a single source of procurement therefor and that the purchase is for the sole purpose of duplicating or replacing supply, equipment, or material, as the case may be, in use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1131, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

20228.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 20221, work on the Oakland Wye complex to the MacArthur Station project and on the Daly City turnback and storage facilities project may be performed by district personnel during periods of operation of the transit system when interconnection work is to be performed within 12 feet of the centerline of the existing track. 

(b) Notwithstanding Section 20221, interconnection work required for the Dublin-Pleasanton Extension, Warm Springs Extension, Pittsburg-Antioch Extension, Colma-San Francisco Airport Extensions, and work required by Department of Transportation retrofit or replacement projects may be performed by district personnel when the work is to be performed within 12 feet of the centerline of existing track or where the tie-in or startup of the work could affect operating train control, traction power, electrical control, or communications systems and the district has determined that there is a clear risk to safety of personnel or to passenger service which requires that district personnel perform the work. 

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), it shall continue to be the policy of the district to perform all interconnection work by competitive bidding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 168, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20229.

In order to facilitate the participation of minority-owned and women-owned businesses in nonfederally funded contracts consistent with federally funded contracts, the district may establish for nonfederally funded contracts percentage goals for participation of those businesses in subcontracts and subsupply contracts in accordance with the provisions of Part 23 (commencing with Section 23.1) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations in effect on January 1, 1983.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 731, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20229.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing board of the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District may direct the purchase of (1) electronic equipment, including, but not limited to, computers, telecommunications equipment, fare collection equipment, and microwave equipment and (2) specialized rail transit equipment, including, but not limited to, rail cars, and contracts for work that include, at a minimum, conversion of the rail car motive power system to alternating current or the complete replacement of existing rail car motive power units that utilize direct current, by competitive negotiation upon a finding by two-thirds of all members of the board that the purchase of that equipment in compliance with provisions of this code generally applicable to the purchase does not constitute a method of procurement adequate for the district’s needs.

(b) Competitive negotiation, for the purposes of this section, shall include, as a minimum, all of the following elements:

(1) A request for proposal shall be prepared and submitted to an adequate number of qualified sources, as determined by the district in its discretion, to permit reasonable competition consistent with the nature and requirements of the procurement. In addition, notice of the request for proposal shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation, which publication shall be made at least 10 days before the proposals are received. The district shall make every effort to generate the maximum feasible number of proposals from qualified sources and shall make a finding to that effect before proceeding to negotiate if only a single response to the request for proposal is received. 

(2) The request for proposal shall identify significant evaluation factors, including price, and their relative importance.

(3) The district shall provide reasonable procedures for technical evaluation of the proposals received, identification of qualified sources, and selection for contract award. 

(4) Award shall be made to the qualified bidder whose proposal will be most advantageous to the district with price and other factors considered. If award is not made to the bidder whose proposal contains the lowest price, the board shall make a finding setting forth the basis for the award. 

(c) The board may reject any and all proposals and request new proposals at its discretion. 

(d) A person who submits, or who plans to submit, a proposal may protest any acquisition conducted in accordance with this section as follows:

(1) Protests based on the content of the request for proposal shall be filed with the district within 10 calendar days after the request for proposal is first advertised in accordance with subdivision (b). The district shall issue a written decision on the protest prior to opening of proposals. A protest may be renewed by refiling the protest with the district within 15 calendar days after the mailing of the notice of the recommended award. 

(2) Any bidder may protest the recommended award on any ground not based upon the content of the request for proposals by filing a protest with the district within 15 calendar days after the mailing of the notice of the recommended award. 

(3) Any protest shall contain a full and complete written statement specifying in detail the grounds of the protest and the facts supporting the protest. Protestors shall have an opportunity to appear and be heard before the board prior to the opening of proposals in the case of protests based on the content of the request for proposals, prior to final award in the case of protests based on other grounds or the renewal of protests based on the content of the request for proposals. 

(e) Where the district, through competitive negotiation, has entered into lease agreements for equipment of the type specified in subdivision (a) subsequent to December 1, 1980, the district may purchase the equipment directly from the lessor upon a finding by two-thirds of all members of the board that the purchase of that equipment in compliance with provisions of this code generally applicable to the purchase does not constitute a method of procurement adequate for the district’s needs. 

(f) Provisions in any contract concerning women and minority business enterprises, which provisions are in accordance with the request for proposals, shall not be subject to negotiation with the successful bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1178, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Southern California Rapid Transit District [20230. - 20234.]

20230.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Southern California Rapid Transit District, as provided for in Part 3 (commencing with Section 30000) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20231.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the award of purchase contracts by the Southern California Rapid Transit District under competitive bid procedures may not be feasible for products and materials which are undergoing rapid technological changes or for the introduction of new technologies into district operations, and that in these circumstances it is in the public interest to consider the broadest possible range of competing products and materials available, fitness of purpose, manufacturer’s warranty, and other similar factors in addition to price in the award of these contracts.

(b) This section applies only to the purchase by the district of computers, telecommunications equipment, fare collection equipment, microwave equipment, and other related electronic equipment and apparatus, and of rail cars. This section does not apply to contracts for construction or for the procurement of any product available in substantial quantities to the general public.

(c) The board may, after a finding by a two-thirds vote that a particular procurement qualifies under subdivision (b), direct that the procurement be conducted through competitive negotiation under this section. For purposes of this section, competitive negotiation includes, but is not limited to, all of the following requirements:

(1) The request for proposals shall be prepared and submitted to an adequate number of qualified sources, as determined by the board, to permit reasonable competition consistent with the nature and requirements of the procurement. In addition, notice of the request for proposals shall be published at least twice in a newspaper of general circulation, at least 10 days before the date for receipt of the proposals. The board shall make every effort to generate the maximum feasible number of proposals from qualified sources and shall make a finding to that effect before proceeding to negotiate if only a single response to the request for proposals is received.

(2) The request for proposals shall identify all significant evaluation factors, including price, and their relative importance.

(3) The board shall provide reasonable procedures for technical evaluation of the proposals received, identification of qualified sources, and selection for contract award.

(4) Award shall be made to the qualified proposer whose proposal will be most advantageous to the district, with price and all other factors considered. If award is not made to the bidder whose proposal contains the lowest price, the board shall make a finding setting forth the basis for the award.

(d) The board may reject any and all proposals and request new proposals, at its discretion.

(e) Upon making an award to a qualified proposer, the board, upon request, shall make available to all other proposers and to the public, an analysis of the award which provides the basis for the selection of that particular qualified proposal.

(f) A person who submits, or who plans to submit, a proposal may protest any acquisition conducted in accordance with this section as follows:

(1) Protests based on the content of the request for proposals shall be filed with the district within 10 calendar days after the request for proposals is first advertised in accordance with subdivision (c). The district shall issue a written decision on the protest prior to the opening of proposals. A protest may be renewed by refiling the protest with the district within 15 calendar days after the mailing of the notice of the recommended award.

(2) Any bidder may protest the recommended award on any ground not based upon the content of the request for proposals by filing a protest with the district within 15 calendar days after the mailing of the notice of the recommended award. 

(3) Any protest shall contain a full and complete written statement specifying in detail the grounds of the protest and the facts supporting the protest. Protestors shall have an opportunity to appear and be heard before the board prior to the opening of proposals in the case of protests based on the content of the request for proposals, or prior to final award in the case of protests based on other grounds or the renewal of protests based on the content of the request for proposals.

(g) Provisions in any contract concerning women and minority business enterprises, which provisions are in accordance with the request for proposals, shall not be subject to negotiation with the successful bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 591, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20232.

If, after rejecting bids, the board determines and declares by a vote of two-thirds of all its members that in its opinion the supplies, equipment and materials may be purchased at a lower price in the open market, the board may proceed to purchase the supplies, equipment and materials in the open market without further observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20233.

In case of an emergency, the board may, by resolution passed by a vote of two-thirds of all its members, declare and determine that public interest and necessity demand the immediate expenditure of public money to safeguard life, health, property, or the public welfare, and thereupon proceed to expend or enter into a contract involving the expenditure of any sum needed to respond to the emergency without observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice. If notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall also comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20234.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Orange County Transit District [20240. - 20242.]

20240.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Orange County Transit District, as provided for in Part 4 (commencing with Section 40000) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20241.

The purchase of all services, supplies, equipment, and materials, and construction of facilities and works, shall be done in the same manner, procedure and subject to the same limitations applicable to the County of Orange by the state law, now or as may hereafter be amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20242.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. San Joaquin Regional Transit District [20250. - 20253.]

20250.

This article applies to contracts by the San Joaquin Regional Transit District, as provided for in Part 5 (commencing with Section 50000) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 704, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20251.

(a) (1) The purchase of all supplies, equipment, and materials, when the expenditure required exceeds seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), shall be by contract let, in the district’s discretion, either to the lowest responsible bidder or to a responsible bidder that submits a proposal that provides the best value to the
 district.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “best value” means the overall combination of quality, price, and other elements of a proposal that, when considered together, provide the greatest overall benefit relative to the requirements described in the solicitation requirements.

(b) For the purchase of supplies, equipment, or materials that exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), but does not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars
 ($75,000), the district shall obtain, to the extent practicable, a minimum of three written or oral quotes that permit the district to compare the prices and terms for the purchase.

(c) The construction of facilities and works, when the expenditure required exceeds three thousand dollars ($3,000), shall be by contract let to the lowest responsible bidder. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, the district may elect to have this construction be governed by Article 3 (commencing with Section 22030) of Chapter 2.

(d) Notice requesting bids shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation, which publication shall be made at least 10 days before bids are received. The board may reject any and all bids and
 readvertise in its discretion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 217, Sec. 1.   (SB 333)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

20251.5.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

20252.

If after rejecting bids the board determines and declares by a four-fifths vote of all its members that in its opinion the supplies, equipment and materials may be purchased at a lower price in the open market, the board may proceed to purchase the supplies, equipment and materials in the open market without further observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids or notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20253.

In case of an emergency, the board may, by resolution passed by a four-fifths vote of all its members, declare and determine that public interest and necessity demand the immediate expenditure of public money to safeguard life, health, or property, and thereupon proceed to expend or enter into a contract involving the expenditure of any sum needed in the emergency without observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice. If notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall also comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 2.1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Marin County Transit District [20260. - 20262.]

20260.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Marin County Transit District, as provided for in Part 7 (commencing with Section 70000) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20261.

The purchase of all supplies, equipment and materials, and construction of facilities and works, shall be done in the same manner, procedure and subject to the same limitations applicable to the County of Marin by state law and by county ordinance, and as the same may hereafter be amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20262.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. San Diego County Transit District [20270. - 20274.]

20270.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the San Diego County Transit District, as provided for in Part 8 (commencing with Section 90000) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20271.

The purchase of all supplies, equipment and materials, and the construction of facilities and works, when the expenditure required exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), shall be by contract let to the lowest responsible bidder. Notice requesting bids shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation, which publication shall be made at least 10 days before bids are received. The board may reject any and all bids and readvertise in its discretion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20272.

If after rejecting bids the board determines and declares by a two-thirds vote of all its members that in its opinion the supplies, equipment and materials may be purchased at a lower price in the open market, the board may proceed to purchase the supplies, equipment and materials in the open market without further observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20273.

In case of an emergency, the board may, by resolution passed by a two-thirds vote of all its members, declare and determine that the public interest and necessity demand the immediate expenditure of public money to safeguard life, health, or property, and thereupon proceed to expend or enter into a contract involving the expenditure of any sum needed in the emergency without observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice. If notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall also comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 2.2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20274.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Santa Barbara Metropolitan Transit District [20280. - 20284.]

20280.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Santa Barbara Metropolitan Transit District, as provided for in Part 9 (commencing with Section 95000) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20281.

The purchase of all supplies, equipment and materials, when the expenditure required exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), and the construction of facilities and works, when the expenditure exceeds three thousand dollars ($3,000), shall be by contract let to the lowest responsible bidder. Notice requesting bids shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation, which publication shall be made at least 10 days before bids are received. The board may reject any and all bids and readvertise in its discretion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 945, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

20282.

If after rejecting bids the board determines and declares by a four-fifths vote of all its members that in its opinion the supplies, equipment and materials may be purchased at a lower price in the open market, the board may proceed to purchase the supplies, equipment and materials in the open market without further observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids or notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20283.

In case of an emergency, the board may, by resolution passed by a four-fifths vote of all its members, declare and determine that public interest and necessity demand the immediate expenditure of public money to safeguard life, health, or property and thereupon proceed to expend or enter into a contract involving the expenditure of any sum needed in the emergency without observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice. If notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall also comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 2.3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20284.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Santa Cruz Metropolitan Transit District [20290. - 20294.]

20290.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Santa Cruz Metropolitan Transit District, as provided for in Part 10 (commencing with Section 98000) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20291.

(a) The purchase of supplies, equipment, and materials, when the expenditure required exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), shall be by contract let, in the district’s discretion, either to the lowest responsible bidder or to the responsible bidder that submits a proposal that provides the best value to the district. “Best value” means the overall combination of quality, price, and other elements of a proposal that, when considered together, provide the greatest overall benefit relative to the requirements described in the solicitation documents.

 (b) The construction of facilities and works, when the expenditure required exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000), shall be by contract let to the lowest responsible
 bidder.

(c) The district shall obtain a minimum of three quotations, either written or oral, that permit the comparison of prices and terms in either of the following circumstances:

(1) In the case of the purchase of supplies, equipment, or materials, if the expected cost of procurement required exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000) and does not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(2) In the case of the construction of facilities and works, if the expected cost of procurement required exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000) and does not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(d) Notice requesting bids shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation, which publication shall be made at least 10 days before bids are
 received.

(e) The board may reject any and all bids and readvertise in its discretion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 107, Sec. 1.   (AB 1089)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

20292.

If after rejecting bids the board determines and declares a four-fifths vote of all its members that in its opinion the supplies, equipment and materials may be purchased at a lower price in the open market, the board may proceed to purchase the supplies, equipment and materials in the open market without further observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids or notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20293.

In case of an emergency, the board may, by resolution passed by a majority vote of all its members, declare and determine that public interest and necessity demand the immediate expenditure of public money to safeguard life, health, or property and thereupon proceed to expend or enter into a contract involving the expenditure of any sum needed in the emergency without observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice. If notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall also comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 2.4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20294.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority [20300. - 20306.]

20300.

The provisions of this article apply to contracts by the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority, as provided for in Part 12 (commencing with Section 100000) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 724, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

20301.

(a) The purchase of all supplies, equipment, and materials, when the expenditure required exceeds two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) shall be by contract let to the lowest responsible bidder, or, in the authority’s discretion, to the responsible bidder who submitted a proposal that provides the best value to the authority on the basis of
 the factors identified in the solicitation. “Best value” means the overall combination of quality, price, and other elements of a proposal that, when considered together, provide the greatest overall benefit in response to the requirements described in the solicitation documents.

(b) To the extent practicable, the authority shall obtain a minimum of three quotations, either written or oral, that permit prices and terms to be compared whenever the expected expenditure required for the purchase of supplies, equipment, or materials exceeds five thousand dollars
 ($5,000), but does not exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).

(c) Notice requesting bids shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation and on the authority’s procurement internet website, which publication shall be made at least 10 days before the bids are received. The board may reject any and all bids and readvertise at its discretion.

(d) This section applies solely to the procurement of supplies, equipment, and materials, and shall not apply to construction contracts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 17, Sec. 1.   (AB 2812)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

20302.

If after rejecting bids the board determines and declares by two-thirds vote of all its members that in its opinion, the supplies, equipment, and materials may be purchased at a lower price in the open market, the board may proceed to purchase the supplies, equipment, and materials in the open market, if the open market purchase price is lower than the rejected bid, without further observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 685, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

20303.

In case of an emergency, as defined under Section 1102, the board, upon adopting a resolution passed by a four-fifths vote of all its members, declaring and determining that public interest and necessity demand the immediate expenditure of public money to safeguard life, health, or property, may expend, or enter into a contract involving the expenditure of, any sum needed in the emergency without observing the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice. If notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 373, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

20304.

Notwithstanding Section 20301, the board may direct the purchase of any supply, equipment, or material without observance of any provision requiring contracts, bids, or notice upon a finding by a vote of two-thirds of all its members of the board that there is only a single source of procurement therefor and that the purchase is for the sole purpose of duplicating or replacing supply, equipment, or material, as the case may be, in use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 685, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

20305.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the authority.

(c) A certified check made payable to the authority.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the authority.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the authority beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 20302 by Stats. 1996, Ch. 685, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

20306.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the award of purchase contracts by the district under competitive bid procedures may not be feasible for products and materials that are undergoing rapid technological changes or for the introduction of new technologies into district operations, and that in these circumstances it is in the public interest to consider the broadest possible range of competing products and materials available, fitness of purpose, manufacturer’s warranty, vendor financing, performance reliability, standardization, life-cycle costs, delivery timetables, support logistics, and other similar factors in addition to price in the award of these contracts.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may direct the purchase the following:

(A) Computers, telecommunications equipment, fare collection equipment, radio and microwave equipment, and other related electronic equipment and apparatus.

(B) Specialized rail transit equipment, including, but not limited to, railcars or tunnel boring machines, by competitive negotiation upon a finding by two-thirds vote of all members of the board that the purchase of those products or materials in compliance with provisions of this code generally applicable to the purchase does not constitute a method of procurement adequate for the district’s needs.

(2) This section does not apply to contracts for construction or for the procurement of any product available in substantial quantities to the general public.

(c) Competitive negotiation, for the purposes of this section includes, but is not limited to, all of the following requirements:

(1) A request for proposals shall be prepared and submitted to an adequate number of qualified sources, as determined by the district in its discretion, to permit reasonable competition consistent with the nature and requirements of the procurement. In addition, a notice of the request for proposals shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation, which shall be made at least 10 days before the date for receipt of the proposals. The district shall make reasonable efforts to generate the maximum feasible number of proposals from qualified sources, and shall make a finding to that effect before proceeding to negotiate if only a single response to the request for proposal is received.

(2) The request for proposals shall identify all significant evaluation factors, including price, and their relative importance.

(3) The district shall provide reasonable procedures for technical evaluation of the proposals received, identification of qualified sources, and selection for contract award.

(4) Prior to making an award, the district shall prepare a price analysis and shall find that the final negotiated price is fair and reasonable based upon comparable procurements in the marketplace.
